District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.109

Foreign corporations — Amendment to articles of incorporation.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(ss), 39 DCR 4863

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.109.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.10.